Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1845.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abortion drug." Any medicine, drug or other substance, or a combination thereof, and excluding a medicine, drug or substance used for contraceptive purposes, when used to intentionally:(1) kill the unborn baby of a woman known to be pregnant; or12345678910111213141516171819 (2) terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant, other than the production of a live birth, or removal of a dead unborn baby.* * *Section 2. Section 12 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 12. Public nuisances.* * *(c) Abortion drugs.--No person shall cause an abortion drug to enter wastewater or public water supply, public water system or the waters of this Commonwealth. The manufacturer or manufacturers of an abortion drug shall be responsible for ensuring proper disposal of the abortion drugs when discarded and for mitigating and remediating an environmental effect of the abortion drug, including endocrine - disrupting chemical byproducts of the abortion drug, that may enter a disposal system, sewage system, public water supply, public water system or the waters of this Commonwealth as a result of the disposal of tainted human remains from an at - home abortion using the abortion drug.(d) Manufacturer liability.--If endocrine - disrupting chemicals from an abortion drug are found in wastewater, a public water system, public water supply or the waters of this Commonwealth, the manufacturer or manufacturers of the abortion drug shall be strictly, absolutely, jointly and severally liable for the cleanup, remediation and any further preventative measure that the department may require. The department shall fine the manufacturer or manufacturers for violations of subsection (c) or this subsection in an amount determined by the department to be sufficient in deterring future violations. If 20250HB1845PN2281 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department is unable to identify the specific manufacturer of the abortion drug found in the wastewater, public water supply, public water system or waters of this Commonwealth, liability shall be apportioned among all manufacturers of abortion drugs in proportion to each manufacturer's share of the national production for abortion drugs at the time of the finding.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1845PN2281 - 3 - 12345678